Rhode Island, session 2025, SB988.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 25-3-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 25-3 entitled "Work on
Holidays and Sundays" is hereby amended to read as follows:
25-3-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Director” means the director of the department of labor and training.
(2) “Economic necessity” means and refers to any case where the director determines that:
(i) Both the economics and technology of manufacture of the product or a component of
the product requires continuous conversion or processing of raw materials, intermediates, or
components without interruption to avoid disproportionate loss of production capacity;
(ii) The economics and technology of data processing requires the continuous operation of
data processing equipment to avoid deterioration of equipment or a disproportionate loss of
computer capacity or where customer requirements are that data processing equipment must be
available for input or output on a continuous basis;
(iii) Because prevailing industry practice in the manufacturing or processing of the product
or in the provision of banking or financial services is to operate facilities within that industry seven
(7) days per week, the failure to operate on one or more Sundays or holidays will subject the
employer to a competitive hardship within the industry in which the employer competes;
(iv) Maintenance or improvement of plant or equipment cannot practically or efficiently

be performed while production is in process;
(v) The scheduling of production on Sundays or holidays is necessitated by interrupted or
allocated energy supplies, or shortages of raw materials or component parts;
(vi) An employer has been deprived of its normal production schedule by fire, flood, power
failure, or other circumstances beyond its control; or
(vii) Circumstances, temporary in nature, are that undue economic hardship would result
from the inability to operate on one or more Sundays or holidays.
(3) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer, but shall not include:
(i) Any individual employed in agriculture or maritime trades, including commercial
fishing or boat repairs;
(ii) Any physician, dentist, attorney at law, or accountant;
(iii) Any individual engaged in the provision of health care or maintenance;
(iv) Any individual employed in a restaurant, hotel, motel, summer camp, resort, or other
recreational facility (except health clubs);
(v) Any individual employed in the business of offshore petroleum or gas exploration or
extraction, or in the business of servicing or supplying persons engaged in exploration or extraction;
(vi) Supervisory employees as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(1) and regulations issued
pursuant to that section;
(vii) Any individual employed by an employer holding a license issued pursuant to chapter
23 of title 5; or
(viii) Any individual employed as part of a telephonic delivery of customer service, sales
operations, and ancillary services related to those services and operations, except for specific
employment positions in the telecommunications industry that are part of any collective bargaining
agreement or employment contract in effect on July 2, 1998.
(4) “Employer” means any natural person, partnership, firm, corporation, or other
enterprise engaged in industry, transportation, communication, or any other commercial occupation
involving one or more employees.
(5) “Holidays” means Sunday, New Year’s Day, Memorial Day, Dr. Martin Luther King,
Jr.’s Birthday, as defined in § 25-2-18, Washington's Birthday, as defined in § 25-1-1, Juneteenth
National Freedom Day, July 4th, Victory Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans’ Day,
Thanksgiving, and Christmas; provided, that as it pertains to all offices of state and municipal
government, the term “holiday” includes in addition to the holidays enumerated in this subdivision,
Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday, as defined in § 25-2-18.
LC002571/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002571/SUB A
========
LC002571/SUB A - Page 3 of 4